src/phonology/olo-phon.twolc
 
"%{ui%}:u"
!! __@RULENAME@__
!! {{{
%{ui%}:u <=> BHarm ( %> ) _ ( %> ) [ %{aäoeöuiy%}: | %{aä%}:] ; !! * @CODE@ ! imperative forms
!!€ kanda%{back%}%>kk%{ui%}%{aä%}mm%{oö%}
!!€ kanda0%>kkuammo
!! }}}

"%{ui%}:i"
!! __@RULENAME@__
!! {{{
%{ui%}:i <=> FHarm ( %> ) _ ( %> ) [ %{aäoeöuiy%}: | %{aä%}:] ; !! * @CODE@ ! imperative forms
!!€ lʼykkä%{front%}%^WGStem%>kk%{ui%}%{aä%}mm%{oö%}
!!€ lʼyk0ä00%>kkiämmö
!! }}}

"A2:a"
!! __@RULENAME@__
A2:a <=> [ a: ] %{back%}: %> _ ( %^WGStem:0 ) [ # | %>  [ n | t | %{uy%}: | m m [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] | t t [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] ]];

"A2:u"
!! __@RULENAME@__
A2:u <=>  u: %{back%}: %> _ ( %^WGStem:0 ) [ # | %>  ];

"A2:y"
!! __@RULENAME@__
A2:y <=> [ y: ] %{front%}: %> _ ( %^WGStem:0 ) [ # | %>  ];


"%{aäuyiØ%}:a"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{aäuyiØ%}:a <=> BHarm Cns: _ ((%{back%}:) %>:) Cns: ;

"%{aäuyiØ%}:u"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{aäuyiØ%}:u <=> BHarm Cns: _ ((%{back%}:) %>:) [%{aä%}: | %^A2UÄ2I: |%^A2UÄ2Y:] ;

"%{aäuyiØ%}:ä"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{aäuyiØ%}:ä <=> FHarm Cns: _ ((%{front%}:) %>:) Cns: ;

"%{aäuyiØ%}:y"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{aäuyiØ%}:y <=> FHarm Cns: _ ((%{front%}:) %>:) %^A2UÄ2Y: ;

"%{aäuyiØ%}:i"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{aäuyiØ%}:i <=> FHarm Cns: _ ((HarmDummy:) %>:) %{aä%}: ;

"%{aäuyiØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{aäuyiØ%}:0 <=> Cns: _  (HarmDummy:) %^RmVow: ;


"a:u before subsequent a"
!! __@RULENAME@__  Diphthong a+a => ua
a:u <=> ConsPalOrNot _ [%{back%}:  ( d:0 ) a  |d:0 a| (%{back%}:) %> [ %{aä%}: | A2:a ] ]; 
!! ostua+V+Inf: __buy/ostaa__
!!€# osta%>%{aä%}
!!€0 ostu%>%{aä%}
!     Cns:   _ %^A2U:0 ;
     Cns: (ʼ) _ (%{back%}:) [%^A2UÄ2I:0| (%>) %{aä%}: |(%>) %{aäoeö%}: |(%>) %{aäoeöuiy%}: | %^A2UÄ2Y:] ;


"ä:i before subsequent A2"
!! __@RULENAME@__  Diphthong ä+ä => iä
ä:i <=>  Cns: (ʼ)  _ [ ä | %> [ %{aä%}:ä | A2:ä ] ]; 
         Cns: (ʼ) _ (%{front%}:) [%^A2UÄ2I:0| (%>) %{aä%}: | (%>) %{aäoeö%}: |(%>) %{aäoeöuiy%}: ] ;
!! kehittiä+V+Inf: __develop/kehittää__
!!€# kehittä%>%{aä%}
!!€0 kehitti%>ä

 
"o:u before subsequent o"
!! __@RULENAME@__ Diphthong o+o => uo erota:eruou
o:u <=> Cns (ʼ) _ (%{back%}:) %> [ %{oö%}: | %{aäoeö%}: |%{aäoeöuiy%}: | o ] ; 
!!€# ero%>%{oö%}%>n
!!€0 eru0o%>n
!!€# runo%>%{oö%}
!!€0 runu%>o
                  _ %{back%}: %> v v ;
!!€# jo%>vv%{aä%}
!!€0 ju%>vva


"ö:y before subsequent ö"
!! __@RULENAME@__ Diphthong ö+ö, ö+%{oö%}:ö => yö
ö:y <=> Cns (ʼ) _ (%{front%}:) %> [ %{oö%}:ö |%{aäoeö%}:| ö ] ; 
!!€# sö%>ö%>y
!!€0 sy%>ö%>y
!!€# pöllö%>ö
!!€0 pölly%>ö
          _ (%{front%}:) %> v v ;
!!€# sö%>vvä
!!€0 sy%>vvä

"e:i before subsequent :e"
!! __@RULENAME@__ Diphthong o+o => uo erota:eruou
!! {{{
 e:i <=> Cns  (HarmDummy:) _ (HarmDummy:) %> [ %{aäoeöuiy%}:e|%{aäoeö%}:e| e ] ;
!!€# valge%>e%^WGStem%>t
!!€0 valgi%>e00t
!!€# hävi%>%{aäPar%}%>n
!!€0 hävi%>e0n
        i _ d: [ o | ä: ] (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem: ;
!!€# tiedo%^WGStem%>n
!!€# tiijo0%>n

         ä [ g: | d: ] (%{front%}:) _ (%{front%}:) %^WGStem: %> Cns: ;
!!€ väge%{front%}%^WGStem>n
!!€ vä0i00%>n
        (HarmDummy:) _ (HarmDummy:) %> %{ijPRC%}: ;
!!€# luge>%{ijPRC%}
!!€0 lugi%>j

!! }}}


"e:o"
!! __@RULENAME@__ Vowel harmony suffixes Back
!! {{{
 e:o <=>  [BHarm]  _ (%{back%}:) %^E2O: %> [ %{uy%}: | u ] ;
!!€# luge%^E2O%>u
!!€0 lugo%>u
!! }}}

"e:ö"
!! __@RULENAME@__ Vowel harmony 
 e:ö <=>  [FHarm]  _ (%{front%}:) %^E2O: %> y ;
!!€# käske%^E2O%>y
!!€0 käskö0%>y

! Word final u, y
"ä:y word final"
!! __@RULENAME@__
ä:y <=> Cns: _ (%{front%}:) [ %^A2U:0|%^A2UÄ2Y:] ;

! Word final ö
"ä:ö word final"
!! __@RULENAME@__
ä:ö <=> Cns: _ (%{front%}:) %^A2O:0 ;


"a:0 in suaja:sai"
!! __@RULENAME@__
!! {{{
a:0 <=>
 a _ (%{back%}:)  %^RmVow:  ; !!= * @CODE@ Vowel shortening before subsequent "i"
[ # Cns:*  [[ u | o ] (i)| u o: ] [ Cns:+ |:Cns+] | # Cns:*  Vow:+ [ Cns:+ |:Cns+] [Vow:+ [ Cns:+ |:Cns+]]+ ] _ [(%{back%}:) %^RmVow: %> i: (%^WGStem:) [ # |  (%{back%}:)  %> [i|Cns] | (%{back%}:)  %> e [n|l]] | (%{back%}:)  %^WGStem: %> i: ] ;
!!€# koira%^RmVow%>i%>en
!!€0 koir00%>i%>en
!!€$ koira0%>j%>en
 Cns: _ (%{back%}:) (%^WGStem:) %^RmVow:  ;
!!€# vahna%^RmVow%>in
!!€0 vahn00%>in
!!€ otta%{back%}%^WGStem%^RmVow%>in
!!€ ot00000%>in
!! }}}

!! !!iToj between vowels
"i:j"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 i:j <=> :Vow (HarmDummy:) ( %>  %^LCns:0 ) %> _ %> :Vow ;

"%{ijPRC%}:i"
!! __@RULENAME@__ 
!! {{{
!! * @CODE@ +ActPrsPrc
 %{ijPRC%}:i <=> :Vow (HarmDummy:)  %> _ [ # | %> [ g i | b o | h %{aä%}: i | g o ] ] ;
!! }}}



"a:o in the plural and preterite"
!! __@RULENAME@__
a:o <=> Cns: _ (%{back%}:) (%^WGStem:) %^A2O: ;
! # Cns* [[ a | i | e ] (u|i)| u a ] [ Cns* (%^NONE:) Cns: ] _ %^A2O: %> i: ( %^WGStem:0 )  ;
!       _ %^A2O: ;
!!€ muama%{back%}%^A2O
!!€ muamo00

"a:e"
!! __@RULENAME@__  pidiä
 a:e <=> _ (%{back%}:) (%^WGStem:0) %^E1:0 ;
!!€# kanda%^WGStem%^E1%>tt%{aäDiph%}s
!!€0 kanne00%>ttas
!!€# kirjava%^E1%>m%^NONEb
!!€0 kirjave0%>m0b

"ä:e piettih and in comparatives"
!! __@RULENAME@__  pidiä
ä:e <=> # Cns* [ i | e ] Cns: _ (%{front%}:) (%^WGStem:0) %^E1:0 ;
      _ (%{front%}:) (%^WGStem:0) %^E1:0 ;
!!€ mečästä%{front%}%^E1%>tt%{aä%}s
!!€ mečäste00%>ttäs


"ä:0 pidiä:pidi"
!! __@RULENAME@__
ä:0 <=> Cns: _ (%{front%}:) (%^WGStem:) %^RmVow:  ;
        ä _ (%{front%}:) (%^WGStem:) %^RmVow:  ;

"i:0 reboi:reboloi"
!! __@RULENAME@__
i:0 <=> o _ (HarmDummy:)  %^ILoss: %> l [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] i ;
      [ e: | i ] (HarmDummy:) %> %{ijPRC%}:  %{oöØ%}: %> i %> _ [ # | %> Cns ]  ;
 Cns: _ (HarmDummy:) (%^WGStem:) %^RmVow:  ;
!!€ rodi%^RmVow%>i%>h
!!€ rod00%>i%>h


"%{oö%}:o"
!! __@RULENAME@__ Vowel harmony suffixes Back
 %{oö%}:o <=>  [BHarm] (  %> ) _ ;
!  [BT|BHarm] (  %> ) _ ;
"%{oö%}:ö"
!! __@RULENAME@__ Vowel harmony suffixes Front
 %{oö%}:ö <=>  [FHarm] (  %> ) _ ;


"%{oöØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__ Vowel harmony suffixes Back
 %{oöØ%}:0 <=> [ u | a | o | ä | ö | y ] (HarmDummy:) %> %{ijPRC%}:  _  ;

"%{oöØ%}:o"
!! __@RULENAME@__ Vowel harmony suffixes Back
 %{oöØ%}:o <=>  [BHarm]  :Cns [ e:0 | e | i ] %> %{ijPRC%}: _  ;
!!€# luge%>%{ijPRC%}%>%{oöØ%}%>i%>n
!!€0 lugi%>j%>o%>i%>s

"%{oöØ%}:ö"
!! __@RULENAME@__ Vowel harmony suffixes Front
 %{oöØ%}:ö <=> [FHarm] :Cns [ e:0| e | i ] %> %{ijPRC%}:  _  ;



"%{uy%}:u"
!! __@RULENAME@__ Vowel harmony suffixes Back
 %{uy%}:u <=>
  [BHarm] ( %> ) _ ;
  [BHarm] (%^WGStem:) %> (n) %{lnrs%}: _ ;
!  [ [BT|BHarm] | :VowBack Cns:* ] ( %> ) _ ;
!  [ [BT|BHarm] | :VowBack Cns:* ] (%^WGStem:) %> (n) %{lnrs%}: _ ;
!!€ tul%>%{lnrs%}%{uy%}h
!!€ tul%>luh

"%{uy%}:y"
!! __@RULENAME@__ Vowel harmony suffixes Front
 %{uy%}:y <=>
  [ FHarm ] ( %> ) _ ;
  [ FHarm ] (%^WGStem:) %> (n) %{lnrs%}: _ ;
!  [ [FT|FHarm] | :VowFront Cns:* ] ( %> ) _ ;
!  [ [FT|FHarm] | :VowFront Cns:* ] (%^WGStem:) %> (n) %{lnrs%}: _ ;

!! !!Consonant change

!
"g:j"
!! __@RULENAME@__
!! {{{
g:j <=> i _ [ a: ] (HarmDummy:) ( %> i ) %^WGStem:0 ;
!!€ poiga%^WGStem%>n
!!€ poija0%>n
!! }}}

"g:v"
!! __@RULENAME@__
g:v <=> [ o | u ] _ [e |u] (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0 ;
!!jogi+N+Sg+Gen: __river/joki__
!!€ joge%^WGStem%>n
!!€ jove0%>n



"g:l"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
g:l <=> l _ [[ a: ] (HarmDummy:) ((%^A2O:|%^RmVow:) %> i )| i | e | u ] (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0 ;
!!€ sulga%^WGStem%>n
!!€ sulla0%>n
!!€ jalga%^A2O%>i%^WGStem%>s
!!€ jallo0%>i0%>s
!! sulgu+N+Pl+Ins __feather/sulka__
!!€ sulga%^RmVow%>i%^WGStem%>n
!!€ sull0%>i0%>n

"g:r"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
!! {{{
g:r <=> r _ [[ a: ] (HarmDummy:) ( %> i )| i | e |ä|ö:] (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0 ;
!!€# särge%^WGStem%>n
!!€0 särre0%>n
!!€# kergi%^WGStem%>t%{aäPar%}
!!€0 kerri0%>tä
!! }}}

! lʼöydiä:lʼövvä
"d:v"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
!! {{{
d:v <=> [ ö y: | o u: ] _ [ ä: | a ] (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0 ; !!= @CODE@
          u a           _   o       (%{back%}:) %^WGStem:0 ; !!= @CODE@
          a             _   u       (%{back%}:) %^WGStem:0 ; !!= @CODE@
        [ u o: | u: ]   _  [ (%{back%}:) e | a: ]  (%{back%}:) ((%^RmVow:) %> i )    %^WGStem:0 ; !!= @CODE@ 
        !!€# vuode%^WGStem%>n
        !!€0 vuvve0%>n
        [ ä y: ]   _  [(%{front%}:) e | y ]  (%{front%}:) ((%^RmVow:) %> i )    %^WGStem:0 ; !!= @CODE@ 
!!€ täydy%{front%}%^WGStem
!!€ tävvy00

!! }}}

"v:y"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 v:y <=> VowFront _ (%{front%}:) %^V2U: ;
! luadie:luajitah
"d:j"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
d:j <=> [ u a ] _ [ i ] (%{back%}:) %^WGStem: %> ;
        [ i e: | a i ] _ [ o | a] (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem: %> ;
!!€ maido%^WGStem%>n
!!€ maijo0%>n
!!€ tiedo%^WGStem%>n
!!€ tiijo0%>n
        i e:  _ ä: (%{front%}:) %^WGStem: %> ;
!!€ tiedä%^WGStem%>n
!!€ tiijä0%>n


"y:v"
!! __@RULENAME@__
y:v <=>  [ ö | ä ] _ d: [ ä: | (%{front%}:) e | y ] (%{front%}:) %^WGStem: [%>| #:] ;
!!€# täydy%^WGStem
!!€0 tävvy0
!! lʼöydiä:lʼövvä

"u:v"
!! __@RULENAME@__
u:v <=> [ o | u ] _ d: [ a: | (%{back%}:) e | u ] (%{back%}:) %^WGStem: [%>| #:] ;
!! juodu+N+Pl+Ade
!!€ juoda%{back%}%^RmVow%>i%^WGStem%>l
!!€ juod000%>i0%>l
!! soudua:sovva

"o:v Lengthening with Ut:vv weakening"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
!! {{{
o:v <=> u _ d: [ (%{back%}:) e | a: ] [(%{back%}:) (%^RmVow:) %> i | (%{back%}:)] %^WGStem:  ;
!! }}}

! vuozi:vuod
"d:z"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
d:z <=> [Vow | r | n ] _ (HarmDummy:) %^D2Z:0 %> i ;
!!€ vuod%^D2Z%>i
!!€ vuoz0%>i
 # Cns* Vow (Vow) (r|n) _ e:0 (HarmDummy:) %^D2Z: (%^WGStem:) %^RmVow: %> i ;
!!€ tunde%^RmVow%>i
!!€ tunz00%>i
 # Cns* i e _ ä:0 (%{front%}:) %^D2Z: (%^WGStem:) %^RmVow: %> i ;

! vuozi:vuod+d%{uy%}, armas:armas+d%{uy%}
"d:t in partitive"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
d:t <=> [ d: | h | :t | (HarmDummy:) s ] (HarmDummy:) ( %^KS2S:0 ) %> _ ;
         [Vow | r | n ] _ (HarmDummy:) %> [ d: %{uy%}: | t y | t u ] ;
!!€# pagis%>d%{aä%}%^WGStemh
!!€0 pa0is%>ta0h

"s:z"
!! __@RULENAME@__
!! {{{
s:z <=> _ (HarmDummy:) %^VOICE:0 ; !!= * @CODE@ pestä: pezen
!! }}}

"k:g"
!! __@RULENAME@__ pestä: peskäh
k:g <=> [ n | l |r ] (HarmDummy:) %> _ (%{ui%}:) %{aä%}: ; 


"rd:rr weakening"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
d:r <=>
     Vow: r _ Vow: (HarmDummy:) ((%^A2O:) %> i) %^WGStem: [ (%^E1:) %> | # ] ;
   Vow r (HarmDummy:) %> _ [ GRC | e %^WGStem: ] ; 
!!purra+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: purrah


"ld:ll weakening"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
d:l <=>
  Vow: l _ Vow: (HarmDummy:) ((%^A2O:) %> i) %^WGStem: [ (%^E1:) %> | # ] ;
  Vow l (HarmDummy:) (%^WGStem:) %> _ [ GRC | e %^WGStem: ] ;

"nd:nn weakening"
!! __@RULENAME@__ 
d:n <=>
     Vow: n _ Vow: (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem: [(%^A2O:) %> i| (%^E1:) %> | # ] ;
!     Vow: n _ Vow: (HarmDummy:) ((%^A2O:) %> i) %^WGStem: [ (%^E1:) %> | # ] ;
  Vow (HarmDummy:) ( %^WGStem:0 %> ) n %> _ [ GRC | e %^WGStem: ] ;
!! mennä+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: mennäh
!!€# kanda%^WGStem%^E1%>tt%{aä%}s
!!€0 kanne00%>ttas


"rn:rr in prtprc"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
%{lnrs%}:r <=> r (HarmDummy:) (%^WGStem:) %> _ (%{uy%}:) (%^WGStem:)  ;

"ln:ll in prtprc"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
%{lnrs%}:l <=> l (HarmDummy:) (%^WGStem:) %> _ (%{uy%}:) (%^WGStem:)  ;
!!€ tul%>%{lnrs%}%{uy%}h
!!€ tul%>luh

"sn:ss in prtprc"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
%{lnrs%}:s <=> s (HarmDummy:) (%^WGStem:) %> _ (%{uy%}:) (%^WGStem:)  ;

"%{dtlnr%}:d"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{dtlnr%}:d <=> Vow: (HarmDummy:) (%^WGStem:) %> _ ; 

"%{dtlnr%}:t"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{dtlnr%}:t <=> s (HarmDummy:) (%^WGStem:) %> _ ; 

"%{dtlnr%}:l"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{dtlnr%}:l <=> l (HarmDummy:) (%^WGStem:) %> _ ; 
!! tulla+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: tullah
!!€ tul%{back%}%>%{dtlnr%}%{aä%}
!!€ tul0%>la
!! kuvitella+V+Inf
!!€ kuvittel%{back%}%^WGStem%>%{dtlnr%}%{aä%}
!!€ kuvi0tel00%>la

"%{dtlnr%}:n"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{dtlnr%}:n <=> n (HarmDummy:) (%^WGStem:) %> _ ; 

"%{dtlnr%}:r"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{dtlnr%}:r <=> r (HarmDummy:) (%^WGStem:) %> _ ; 

!! !CONSONANT LOSS
 
"čToZero"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
!! {{{
č:0 <=> _ č [ ((HarmDummy:) %>) Vow | Vow: (HarmDummy:) %> i ] %^WGStem:0 ; !! * @CODE@ suvaija:suvaičen
 _ č Vow: (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0 ; 
!! }}}

"kToZero"
!! __@RULENAME@__  aika: ajan
!! {{{
k:0 <=> _ s (HarmDummy:) %^KS2S:0 ;
        _ k [ Vow (HarmDummy:) | Vow: (HarmDummy:) %^A2O: %> i | e h (HarmDummy:) ] %^WGStem:0 ;
!!€ lʼykkä%{front%}%^WGStem%>t%{AÄ%}
!!€ lʼy0kä00%>tä
!!€ abuniekka%{back%}%^A2O%>i%>l
!!€ abunie0ko00%>i%>l
!!€ liikkeh%{front%}%^WGStem
!!€ lii0keh00

!! }}}
